Hawaii statutes.
[§327E-15] Uniformity of application and
construction. This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate
its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this
chapter among states enacting it. [L 1999, c 169, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next